District of Columbia statutes.
22-1806

Accessories after the fact.

Whoever shall be convicted of being an accessory after the fact to any crime punishable by death shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 20 years. Whoever shall be convicted of being accessory after the fact to any crime punishable by imprisonment shall be punished by a fine or imprisonment, or both, as the case may be, not more than 1/2 the maximum fine or imprisonment, or both, to which the principal offender may be subjected.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1337, ch. 854, § 909
1973 Ed., § 22-106.
1981 Ed., § 22-106.